North Dakota, session 69, HB1458.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 23-12 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Releasing a self-spreading virus - Written consent required.
1. As used in this section:
a. "Release" means any intentional act that results in the actual or potential
infection or transmission of, or exposure to, a self-spreading virus or bacteria.
b. "Self-spreading virus or bacteria" means any engineered virus or bacteria,
including any recombinant, attenuated or modified version of any virus or
bacteria, or particles or substance similar to any virus or bacteria, engineered for
the purpose of spreading from individual to individual.
2. A person may not develop, release, or take part in causing the release of any self-
spreading virus or bacteria without the express written consent of each individual who
may potentially be exposed to the self-spreading virus or bacteria.
3. Any person may bring an action to enjoin any violation of this section and to recover
actual monetary loss or five thousand dollars for each violation of this section,
whichever is greater.
4. This section does not apply to an individual who is unknowingly infected and, as a
result of that infection, has spread any self-spreading virus or bacteria.
Page No. 1 25.0977.02000